Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 2

Offenses by Public Officers and Employees (“Little Hatch Act”)

2-19-201. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Election” includes all elections, local, municipal, primary, general, state, federal and special and any election in the state or any county, municipality or other political subdivision thereof, but does not include referenda or issues submitted to a vote of the people, political convention or caucus;

“Public funds” and “public lands, offices, buildings, vehicles and facilities” include those owned and supported principally by public money appropriated from the state treasury. “Public lands, offices, buildings, vehicles, and facilities” include those owned and used by a local education agency (LEA);

“Public officers and employees” means all employees of the executive branch of the state government, or any department, division, or agency thereof, and all appointed officers and employees of any educational institution, establishment, corporation or agency supported principally by state funds, including teachers. Popularly elected officials, officials elected by the general assembly, qualified candidates for public office, members of the governor's cabinet, and members of the governor's staff are expressly excluded from the provisions of this part, except for the provisions of § 2-19-202; and

“Teacher” means any person employed in a public school system as a teacher, helping teacher, teacher's aide, librarian, principal, supervisor, director of schools, or member of the administrative staff.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1936; Acts 2015, ch. 239, §§ 1-4.

Compiler's Notes. Section 49-1501, referred to in subdivision (3), was repealed by Acts 1972, ch. 814, § 18. Prior to its repeal § 49-1501 defined “teacher” as follows:

“‘Teacher’ shall mean any person employed in a public school as a teacher, helping teacher, librarian, principal, or supervisor, and shall include any superintendent of public schools, or administrative officer of a department of education, or of any educational institution supported in whole or in part by and under the control of the state. In all cases of doubt, the board of trustees hereinafter defined shall determine whether any person is a teacher as defined in this chapter.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added “‘Public lands, offices, buildings, vehicles, and facilities’ include those owned and used by a local education agency (LEA)” at the end of (2); in (3), added “, including teachers” at the end of the first sentence and deleted “teachers, as defined by § 49-1501,” preceding “members of the governor's cabinet”; added the definition of “teacher”; and made related punctuation changes.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 239, § 8. July 1, 2015.

Cross-References. County Sheriff's Civil Service Law, political activity of persons in classified service restricted, §8-8-419.

Extortion, §39-14-112.

Attorney General Opinions. Prohibitions on state employees running for public office, OAG 98-030 (1/29/98).

Department of children's services employee running for county commission, OAG 05-141 (9/12/05).

Employee of a state institution of higher education holding elected office. OAG 14-17, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 18 (2/11/14).

State law does not prohibit elected state officials from using state property, including the Executive Residence, for campaign-related activities. Tennessee’s Campaign Financial Disclosure Act would require the disclosure of expenditures incurred for such campaign-related activities on state property if they constitute either a “contribution” or an “expenditure” as defined under the Act. To the extent that the Governor’s non-personal schedule, including events at the Executive Residence, meets the definition of “public record” as set forth in T.C.A. § 10-7503(a)(1)(A), then it is subject to disclosure under Tennessee’s Public Records Act, unless a state law provides otherwise. OAG 16-48, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (12/22/2016).

2-19-202. Interference with election or nomination.

It is unlawful for any public officer or employee to use such person's official position, authority or influence to interfere with an election or nomination for office or directly or indirectly attempt to intimidate, coerce or command any other officer or employee to vote for or against any measure, party or person, or knowingly receive or pay assessments of any kind or character for political purposes or for election expenses from any other officer or employee.

It is the intent of this section to prohibit any political intimidation or coercion of any public officer or employee.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1937.

Attorney General Opinions. The Tennessee Hatch Act would not prohibit a county teacher from qualifying and running as a candidate for partisan political office. However, only the U.S. Office of Special Counsel (“OSC”) is authorized to issue advisory opinions under the federal Hatch Act, including opinions on whether an individual’s proposed political activity is prohibited under the Act. OAG 17-54, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 53 (12/13/2017).

2-19-203. Soliciting contributions for political purposes.

It is unlawful for any public officer or employee knowingly to solicit directly or indirectly any contribution of money, thing of value, facilities or services of any person who has received contracts, compensation, employment, loans, grants or benefits, or any person whose organization, agency or firm has received such benefits financed by public funds, state, federal or local, for political purposes or campaign expense.

As used in this subsection (b), unless the context otherwise requires, “contribution” means any advance, conveyance, deposit, distribution, transfer of funds, loan, loan guaranty, payment, gift, or subscription, of money or thing of value, including, but not limited to, use of a facility or provision of personal services, for use on behalf of any candidate for political office, or for any political purpose or campaign expense.

It is unlawful knowingly to solicit, accept, or collect, directly or indirectly, any contribution from a public officer or employee if the solicitor or the solicitor's principal is, directly or indirectly, in a supervisory capacity over such officer or employee or is otherwise able to control the retention, promotion, demotion, or terms or conditions of employment of such officer or employee.

The provisions of this subsection (b) shall not be construed to prevent voluntary contributions from political action committees and associations of public officers and/or employees.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 280, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1938; Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 1 (1st Ex. Sess.), § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Attorney General Opinions. Prohibitions on state employees running for public office, OAG 98-030 (1/29/98).

2-19-204. Promises of benefits for political activity.

It is unlawful for any public officer or employee, directly or indirectly, to promise employment, position, work, compensation, contracts, loans, grants, appropriations or other benefits provided principally from public funds as a consideration, favor or reward for any political activity, support or opposition to any candidate, party or measure in any election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1939.

2-19-205. Deprivation, attempts to deprive, or threats to deprive persons of benefits.

It is unlawful for any public officer or employee, directly or indirectly, to deprive, attempt to deprive, or threaten to deprive any person of employment, position, work, compensation, contracts, loans, grants, appropriations or benefits provided principally from public funds for any political activity, support or opposition to any candidate, party or measure in any election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1940.

Attorney General Opinions. The Tennessee Hatch Act would not prohibit a county teacher from qualifying and running as a candidate for partisan political office. However, only the U.S. Office of Special Counsel (“OSC”) is authorized to issue advisory opinions under the federal Hatch Act, including opinions on whether an individual’s proposed political activity is prohibited under the Act. OAG 17-54, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 53 (12/13/2017).

2-19-206. Use of state-owned property for campaign advertising or activities.

It is unlawful for any elected or appointed official of the state, or any employee of the state or any department, division or agency thereof, to display campaign literature, banners, placards, streamers, stickers, signs or other items of campaign or political advertising on behalf of any party, committee or agency or candidate for political office, on the premises of any building or land owned by the state, or to use any of the facilities of the state, including equipment and vehicles, for such purposes.

It is unlawful to use public buildings or facilities for meetings or preparation of campaign activity in support of any particular candidate, party or measure unless reasonably equal opportunity is provided for presentation of all sides or views, or reasonably equal access to the buildings or facilities is provided all sides.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit an employee from displaying a decal or bumper stickers on the employee's personal vehicle while parked on state property.

Subsections (a), (b), and (c) shall not apply to teachers.

It is unlawful for any teacher to display campaign literature, banners, placards, streamers, stickers, signs, or other items of campaign or political advertising on behalf of any party, committee or agency, or candidate for partisan or nonpartisan public office elected by the people, on the premises of any building or land owned by a local education agency (LEA), or to use any of the facilities of the LEA, including equipment and vehicles, for such purposes. This subdivision (d)(2) does not apply to the display of campaign banners, placards, streamers, stickers, signs, or other items of campaign or political advertising on LEA-owned property or the use of LEA equipment, when the display or use is a part of and solely for the purpose of the LEA's program of student education relative to the electoral process. Except for the use of LEA-owned equipment and vehicles, this subdivision (d)(2) does not apply to a teacher during hours in which the teacher is not performing school duties.

This subsection (d) shall not be construed to prohibit any teacher from displaying a decal or bumper sticker on the teacher's personal vehicle while the vehicle is parked on LEA property.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1941; Acts 2008, ch. 650, § 1; 2015, ch. 239, § 5.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 239, § 8. July 1, 2015.

Attorney General Opinions. Prohibitions on state employees running for public office, OAG 98-030 (1/29/98).

It would not violate T.C.A. §2-19-206(b) for a state legislator to use his or her office for fundraising phone calls for a not-for profit entity formed to promote the lottery referendum on the 2002 ballot, OAG 02-114 (10/16/02).

It would violate T.C.A. §2-19-206(b) for a state legislator to use his or her office to disseminate information regarding the state lottery referendum for a not-for-profit entity formed to promote the lottery referendum on the 2002 ballot, OAG 02-114 (10/16/02).

A legislative staff member does not violate T.C.A. §2-19-206(b) by responding on behalf of the legislator to requests for information regarding a referendum or assisting the legislator in carrying out his or her duties informing the public about a referendum election, so long as this response or information does not directly advocate voting in favor of the referendum issue, OAG 02-114 (10/16/02).

Distributing information, addressing specific issues, or responding to specific events that relate to an issue of public interest, even if it also serves the purpose of an independent organization, is not prohibited by T.C.A. §2-19-206, so long as the information or response does not directly advocate voting for or against a referendum issue, OAG 02-132 (12/12/02).

Staff member could violate T.C.A. §2-19-206 if the member performs support functions for a legislator such as preparing a mass mailing that directly advocates voting for or against a referendum issue, OAG 02-132 (12/12/02).

Legislative staff member would violate this section by directly requesting contributions to an organization formed for the purpose of advocating popular approval of proposed amendments to the state constitution in a referendum either during regular business hours or in a state building, OAG 02-132 (12/12/02).

State law does not prohibit elected state officials from using state property, including the Executive Residence, for campaign-related activities. Tennessee’s Campaign Financial Disclosure Act would require the disclosure of expenditures incurred for such campaign-related activities on state property if they constitute either a “contribution” or an “expenditure” as defined under the Act. To the extent that the Governor’s non-personal schedule, including events at the Executive Residence, meets the definition of “public record” as set forth in T.C.A. § 10-7503(a)(1)(A), then it is subject to disclosure under Tennessee’s Public Records Act, unless a state law provides otherwise. OAG 16-48, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (12/22/2016).

Collateral References.

Constitutionality, construction, and application of statute or regulatory action respecting political advertising — Print media cases. 51 A.L.R.6th 359.

Constitutionality, construction, and application of statute or regulatory activity respecting political advertising nonprint media cases, or cases implicating both print and nonprint media. 53 A.L.R.6th 491.

2-19-207. Political activity interfering with state business.

It is unlawful for any person employed by the state to engage actively in a political campaign on behalf of any party, committee, organization, agency or political candidate, or to attend political meetings or rallies or to otherwise use such person's official position or employment to interfere with or affect the result of any regular or special primary election conducted within the state, or to perform political duties or functions of any kind not directly a part of such person's employment, during those hours of the day when such person is required by law or administrative regulation to be conducting the business of the state.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to deprive any official or employee of the state from voting for the party or candidate of such person's choice or to deprive such person of the right to express such person's personal opinion concerning any political subject, party or candidate.

Elected officials, state employees on leave or during those hours not required by law or administrative regulation to be conducting the business of the state, and persons duly qualified as candidates for public office are expressly excluded from this section.

No rule or regulation which has been promulgated or shall be promulgated by any department, division, agency, or bureau of state government shall be more restrictive of the political activity of state employees on leave or during those hours not required by law or administrative regulation to be conducting the business of the state than those restrictions already set forth in this section.

Subsections (a) and (b) shall not apply to teachers.

It is unlawful for any teacher employed by an LEA during those hours of the day when the LEA requires the teacher to be performing school duties to:

Engage actively in a political campaign on behalf of any party, committee, organization, or agency;

Engage in a campaign for a candidate for partisan or nonpartisan public office elected by the people;

Attend political meetings or rallies;

Use the teacher's employment to interfere with or affect the result of any regular or special primary election conducted within the state; or

Perform political campaign duties or functions.

Nothing in this subsection (c) shall be construed to deprive a teacher from voting for the party or candidate of the teacher's choice or to deprive the teacher of the right to express the teacher's personal opinion concerning any political subject, party, or candidate.

A teacher on leave or during those hours in which the teacher is not required to be performing school duties is not subject to the restrictions in subdivision (c)(2). No policy or rule of an LEA shall be more restrictive of the political activity of a teacher on leave or during those hours in which the teacher is not required to be performing school duties than those restrictions set forth in this subsection (c).

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1942; Acts 1982, ch. 822, § 1; 2015, ch. 239, §§ 6, 7.

Compiler's Notes. Section 49-1501, referred to in subsection (b)(2), was repealed by Acts 1972, ch. 814, § 18. Prior to its repeal § 49-1501 defined “teacher” as follows:

“‘Teacher’ shall mean any person employed in a public school as a teacher, helping teacher, librarian, principal, or supervisor, and shall include any superintendent of public schools, or administrative officer of a department of education, or of any educational institution supported in whole or in part by and under the control of the state. In all cases of doubt, the board of trustees hereinafter defined shall determine whether any person is a teacher as defined in this chapter.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “and persons duly qualified as candidates for public office” for “persons duly qualified as candidates for public office and teachers, as defined by § 49-1501,” in (b)(2); and added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 239, § 8. July 1, 2015.

Cross-References. Noninstructional public school personnel eligible to run for public office, §49-5-301.

Attorney General Opinions. Prohibitions on state employees running for public office, OAG 98-030 (1/29/98).

A legislative staff member does not violate T.C.A. §2-19-207 by responding to requests for information and assisting a legislator in disseminating information about a referendum, so long as the response or information does not directly advocate voting in favor of the referendum issue, OAG 02-114 (10/16/02).

Distributing information, addressing specific issues, or responding to specific events that relate to an issue of public interest, even if it also serves the purpose of an independent organization, is not prohibited by T.C.A. §2-19-207, so long as the information or response does not directly advocate voting for or against a referendum issue, OAG 02-132 (12/12/02).

Staff member could violate T.C.A. §2-19-207 if the member performs support functions for a legislator such as preparing a mass mailing that directly advocates voting for or against a referendum issue, OAG 02-132 (12/12/02).

Legislative staff member would violate T.C.A. §2-19-207 by directly requesting contributions to an organization formed for the purpose of advocating popular approval of proposed amendments to the state constitution in a referendum either during regular business hours or in a state building, OAG 02-132 (12/12/02).

The Tennessee Claims Commission is part of the executive branch of the government. A Tennessee claims commissioner is not a member of the judiciary and employees of the claims commission and claims commissioners are subject to T.C.A. §2-19-207. OAG 13-111, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 114 (12/30/13).

2-19-208. Penalty for violations by public officers and employees.

A violation of this part is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1943; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.